android/device/softwinner/wing-common/apkdata/txt2epub/hyphenDicts/hyph_fr.dic
mi2nue.
mi1n2u
mi1né.
1mi3q
2mie.
1mid
mi1le
mi1lé
mi1c
mu1ré
mu1n
mu1su
mu1se
mu3sé
1mué
mu1lé
mu1g
m2e
2me.
1mea
1me1re2
1meo
1med
1mez
mel1
1mem2
m1b
m1bè1
mé3r
1mé2o
mé2n2i
mé1n
1méu
mé1t
mé1l
mé1m
mé1ch
mé1g
mé1p
mè1res
mè1d
m1l
1mî
mmai1r
mm2a
mma3ges
m1h
m2c
m1g
m1p
m2pie
mp1tr
m2pt
m1pè1
mpla3ce
mpla2c
1mâ
mâ1c
my1ri
myr2
my2s
1mê
1mô
ha1n2e
han1tr
ha1bo
ha1m2a
ha1gr
ha1v
h1rai
h1raï
ho1ri
ho1re
ho1ni1h
hon2i
h1n2o
h1n2i
hi3ques
hi1b
his1c
hi1th
hi1lé
hi1ve
hu1m2e
hu1c
heu2res
he1ta
he1li
he3v
h1b
h1sa
h1se
h1sé
h1ta
h1to
h2ti
h1th
hé1b
hé1t
hé1l
hé1m2e
hé1v
hè1n
hè1ve
h1le
h1m2a
h1mo
h1v
h1p
h1k
hô1
hô3t
1ca
ca1n2i
can2c
cai1r
ca1th
ca1len
ca1c
ca1ges
ca1v
ca1pa
ca1pr
ca1po
ca1pe
cra1s
cra1c
cri2s
1cru
2c2re.
1cres
1cred
1crez
1cré
1cor
co1ri
con2
2cont
3contri
3contre
3con1tré
3contrè
coue3ra
coue2r
cou3tes
cou3len
cou3lez
cou1lé
couver3tes
cou1v
1coe
1cob
1cot
1colt
1com
co1m2e
co1g2
co1pl
cof2
1ci
ci1re
ci1né
2cie.
cien2c
ci1sé
4ci1to
ci1d
ci1les
ci1m
ci1v
c1q
1cu
2cub
cu1sa
cu1ser
cu3sé
cu1tes
cul2
2cu2l.
cu1ler
cu1les
2cult
cu1lé.
cu1lés
cu1m2e
cu2v
2ce.
1cer
cer3né
cer1n
cer3ti
1cen
1cei
1ceu
1cet
ce1lo
ce1li
ce1lu
ce1lè
1cem2
c1t
c2tre
c1tu2
1cé.
1céen
cé2e
1cés
1céd
cé1l
cé1m
cé1p
1cè
cè1r
cè1l
c2l
1cli
1cler
1clen
1clez
1clé
1clè
1clâ
1cly
1cî
2c1m
2ch.
1cha.
1chon
2chn
chi2v
2che.
1cher
3chen
1ches1s
1chez
2ch1b
1chèr
c1c
ccu1s
c1cu
c1p
c1ki
1cy
cy1p
1cê
cê3tres
1cû
c’é3
2g.
1gan
1ga1b
1gas
gastro1n2o3
ga2st
gas1tro
1gaz
ga1m2a
1ga1g
gru1
1go
go1n2i
go1li
2g2n.
1gna
gna3ges
1gnon
gn2o
1gn2i
2g2ne.
gn2e
1gner
1gnen
1gneu
1gnes
1gnez
1gnem
1gné
1gnè1
1gnâ
1gny
1gi.
gi1re
1gin
gi1né
1giq
gi3ques
1gies
1gi2st
gi1sl
1gil
gi1les
1gic
1gu
2gue.
3gues
gu1m
2ge.
1gea
1ger
1geo
1geu
1ges1s
1get
ge1d
1gez
1gel
1gem
gem1m
1geâ
2gt
g1to
g1te
1gé.
1gé1r
gé2n2i
gé1n
2gée.
gé2e
1gées
gé1t
1gé1l
gé1m
g1d
1gè
1gla
1gler
1glen
3glet
1glem
1glé
1glè
g1m
g1ha
2gg
g1gr
g1gi
g1gl
1gâ
gâ1c
gê1n2e
2v.
va2rie
va1ri
va1q
vau1tr
va1b
va1t
va1le
1vag
va1ges
va1p
1vra.
1vras
1vron
2v2re.
1vrez
vo1ri
vo1ré
voi3les
voi3lés
vo1q
vou1d
vou1l
vo1le
vo1lé
vi1re
vi1n2i
vi1nem
vin2e
2vie.
vi3té
vi1du
viè3res
vi1les
vi1vra
1vu
vu1r
2ve.
1ve2r.
1ve1ra
veu1l
1ves
1vet
ve1lo
ve1li
vel4les
1vem2
1vé.
2vée.
vé2e
3vées
1vés
vé1l
vè1res
vè1n
1vâ
2p.
1pa.
par1q
pa1n2e
1pas1
pa1tr
2patib
pa1ti
pa1th
1pad
pa2de
1pac
pa1ch
pa2ve
pa1vé
priè3res
pri3v
2p2re.
pré3t
pos3s
po1te
pol2
po1li
1pia
pi1res
pi1n2i
2pie.
1pier
1pien
3pies
pi2s2t
pi3tres
1pié
pi1ces
2pu.
pu1n
2pue
pu1b
2pus
pu1tes
pu1d
1pul
pu1len
2pe.
1pea
1pe2r.
per3tes
1pen
1peu
pe1sa
1pet
pe3ti
1pel
pe1lè
1pem
2ps
p3sh
2pt
p1ta
pti1l
p1ti
p1ten
p1tes
p1tem
1pé.
2pé2e
pé1t
1péd
pé1l
pé1c
1pè
pè1l
pè1ces
pla2c
p1lio
2p2le.
plè3
1pho
1phi
2phe.
2pht
p1p
ppor3tes
ppé2
p3pées
p2pé2e
p1pè1
1pâ
1py1
1pê
pê1tr
pê1tes
â1ta
â1tri
â1tres
â1to
â2tit
â1ti
â1ten
â1li
â1leu
â1les
â1m
â1ces
â1cha
â1ches
â1ché
ï1ra
ï1ro
ï1ru
ï1t
ï1d
ï1f
1j
ja1ré
ja1q
jas1
ja1m2a
ja1m2e
jac2
ja1v
ja1k
jo1ri
joue3ra
joue2r
jo1t
jo1l
ji1
ju1ré
ju1m
ju1g
je1ri
je1ta
j’ai2
j’a2
2f.
1fa
fa1né
fa1br
fa1m
fa2mé2e
fa2cu
fa1cé
fa1v
1fra
2f2re.
2fres
fou2
fol1l
fo1m
fin2
fi1n2i
fi1nem
fin2e
fi1né.
fi3ques
fi3quem
2fie.
fi1b
fi1d
fi1le
fi1lé
1fic
fi2cu
1fu
fu2rie.
fu1ri
fu1re
fu1sa
fu1ser
ful1
fu1gi
fu1ges
2fe.
fer3tes
fen1t
fes1
2fs
2fée.
fé2e
fé1l
fé1m
fè1v
1fl
2f2le.
1fâ1
f1f
f1fu1
fê2
xa1m
xami1
xi1lés
xi1m
x1q
xul1
x1t
x1m
x1h
x1c
x1p
k1ar
k1r
ko1r
ku1m
1ker
1ké1
k1ly
k1g
k1k
ya1g
ya2ges
yr2
y1ra
y1ro
y1rien
y1ru
y1rè
y1na
y1n2o
yu1
y1b
y1se
ys1m
y2di
yè1
y1lo
y1m2a
y1mo
y1mes
ym2e
y1co
y2ci
y1c2l
y1ch
y1po
y1pi1
y1pes
y1ph
ê1nes
ên2e
ê1ques
ê1ta
ê1tri
ê1to
ê2tit
ê1ti
ê2tue
ê1tu
ê1ten
ê1tem
ê1la
ê1li
ê1ler
ê1len
ê1lé.
ê1lés
ê1lè
ê1c
1ç
çu1r
2çue.
û1ri
û1res
û1ret
û1rem
û1ta
û1ten
û1la
û1ler
û1len
û1lé.
û1lées
ûlé2e
û1lés
û1m
ô1na
ô1ner
ôn2e
ô1nes
ô1né
ô2t
ô3tres
ôtiè1
ô1ti
ô3tu
ô1d
ô1lé
’a2
’ar1ti1
’anna1
’an2n
’abeil3
’at3t
’at1l
’aî1
’am2b
’avanta3ges
’avan1ta
’o2
’o4si
’om2b
’i2
’in1t
’in1di1
’ima3ges
’im2a
’u2
’u1ti1
’e2
’en1
’eux1mê3
’eux1m
’é2
’élè3ver
’â2
wa1k
ws1
w1d
'a2
'a1si3
'i2
'en1
'é2
